Utah statutes.
41-6a-309.   Prohibition of unauthorized signs, signals, lights, or markings -- Commercial advertising -- Public nuisance -- Removal.

(1) Except as provided in Section 41-6a-310, a person may not place, maintain, or display upon or in view of any highway any unauthorized sign, signal, light, marking, or device which:

(a)  purports to be or which resembles a traffic-control device or railroad sign or signal, or authorized emergency vehicle flashing light;

(b)  attempts to direct the movement of traffic;

(c)  hides from view or interferes with the effectiveness of a traffic-control device or any railroad sign or signal; or

(d)  blinds or dazzles an operator on any adjacent highway.

(2) Except as provided under Section 72-7-504 regarding logo advertising, a person may not place or maintain any commercial advertising on any traffic-control device.

(3)  The provisions of Subsections (1) and (2) do not prohibit a sign on private property adjacent to a highway providing directional information in a manner that may not be mistaken for a traffic-control device.

(4)  Every prohibited sign, signal, or light, or marking is a public nuisance and the highway authority having jurisdiction over the highway may remove it or cause it to be removed without notice.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 2, 2005 General Session

